Vermont, session 2025-2026, H855.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 1036a is added to read:
§ 1036a. DEFENSE PROHIBITED; HARM CAUSED BY AUTONOMOUS
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
(a) In an action against a defendant who developed, modified, or used
artificial intelligence that is alleged to have caused harm to the plaintiff, it shall
not be a defense, and the defendant shall not assert, that the artificial
intelligence autonomously caused the harm to the plaintiff.
VT LEG #386376 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.855
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) This section shall not limit or preclude a defendant from presenting:
(1) any other affirmative defenses allowed by law; or
(2) any other relevant evidence, including evidence relevant to
causation, foreseeability, or contributory or comparative negligence.
(c) As used in this section, “artificial intelligence” means an engineered or
machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for
explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate
outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386376 v.1